Massachusetts, session 194th, H5115.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 244. The commissioner of public health shall promulgate regulations for the
annual health inspection of food trucks. The commissioner shall prescribe rules and regulations
relative to inspection schedules, documentation of inspections, standards for acceptable
cleanliness and the costs of such inspections.
SECTION 2. The commissioner of public health shall promulgate the regulations set
forth in section 1 not later than 1 year after the enactment of this act.
of 1